Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 20268-3213
Term and termination.

(a) Unless otherwise provided in the account agreement, a special deposit terminates five years after the date the special deposit was first funded.

(b) Unless otherwise provided in the account agreement, if the financial institution cannot identify or locate a beneficiary entitled to payment when the special deposit is terminated, and a balance remains in the special deposit, the financial institution shall pay the balance to the depositor or depositors as a beneficiary or beneficiaries.

(c) A financial institution that pays the remaining balance as provided under subsection (b) has no further obligation with respect to the special deposit.

Laws 2025, LB231, § 13.